Utah statutes.
58-17b-609.   Limitation on prescriptions and refills -- Controlled Substances Act not affected -- Legend drugs.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection 58-16a-102, a prescription for any prescription drug or device may not be dispensed after one year from the date it was initiated except as otherwise provided in Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act.

(2)  A prescription authorized to be refilled may not be refilled after one year from the original issue date.

(3)  A practitioner may not be prohibited from issuing a new prescription for the same drug orally, in writing, or by electronic transmission.

(4)  Nothing in this chapter affects Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act.

(5)  A prescription for a legend drug written by a licensed prescribing practitioner in another state may be filled or refilled by a pharmacist or pharmacy intern in this state if the pharmacist or pharmacy intern verifies that the prescription is valid.

